Washington statutes.
RCW 36.17.042

Weekly or biweekly pay periods.

In addition to the pay periods permitted under RCW 36.17.040, counties may pay county officers and employees using the following methods:

(1) The legislative authority of any county may establish a weekly or biweekly pay period where county officers and employees receive their compensation not later than seven days following the end of each pay period for services rendered during that pay period, except as authorized under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) In a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW, the county legislative authority may establish a weekly or biweekly pay period where the county officers and employees receive their compensation not later than thirteen days following the end of each pay period for services rendered during that pay period.

(3) The legislative authority of any county that currently uses a semimonthly pay period under RCW 36.17.040 may adopt a biweekly pay period. In such counties, county officers and employees shall receive their compensation not later than thirteen days following the end of each pay period for services rendered during that pay period.

[ 2009 c 239 s 1; 1995 c 38 s 3; 1994 c 301 s 5; 1977 c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.